Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3713
Receiver; sale of divested real estate.

The receiver shall sell any real estate ordered to be divested pursuant to section 76-3712 at public auction no later than one year after the date such divestment is ordered by the court. The receiver shall execute the sale of the real estate in the manner provided for in the Nebraska Trust Deeds Act. The purchaser at any sale conducted by the receiver pursuant to the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act shall receive title to the real estate purchased, free from all claims of the owner or prior holder thereof and of all persons claiming through or under the owner or prior holder. The receiver shall execute all documents necessary to complete the transfer of title.

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 16.

Nebraska Trust Deeds Act, see section 76-1018.